Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20173-161
Reference to Department of Aeronautics in contracts or other documents; how construed; contracts and property; how treated.

On and after July 1, 2017, whenever the Department of Aeronautics is referred to or designated by any contract or other document in connection with the duties and functions transferred to the Division of Aeronautics of the Department of Transportation pursuant to Laws 2017, LB339, such reference or designation shall apply to such division. All contracts entered into by the Department of Aeronautics prior to July 1, 2017, in connection with the duties and functions transferred to the division are hereby recognized, with the division succeeding to all rights and obligations under such contracts. Any cash funds, custodial funds, gifts, trusts, grants, and any appropriations of funds from prior fiscal years available to satisfy obligations incurred under such contracts shall be transferred and appropriated to the division for the payments of such obligations. All documents and records transferred, or copies of the same, may be authenticated or certified by the division for all legal purposes.

Laws 2017, LB339, § 51.